Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.06
Clerk of the district court; deposits; security; contracts.

Every depository may secure deposits by giving a surety bond or giving security as provided in section 77-2326.04 and otherwise enter into and become a party to any contract or arrangement not inconsistent with this section, as may be reasonably necessary or proper to render fully effective section 77-2326.04. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 6, p. 870;

Laws 1988, LB 703, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 47;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 35;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 47.